Nebraska, session 109, LB1247.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-3003, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-3003 (1)(a) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges
shall award a Nebraska Career Scholarship that does not exceed a maximum
of fifteen thousand dollars per year to any eligible state college
student (i) who achieved a composite score on a standard college
admission test equivalent to a score of at least eighteen out of a
maximum score of thirty-six or an equivalent score on the SAT® or who had
a high school grade-point average of 3.0 or greater on a four-point scale
and (ii) who is enrolled in an eligible program of study.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall
allocate funds appropriated to the board under the Nebraska Career
Scholarship Act between the state college campuses, determine the
eligibility of students enrolled in a state college, receive and process
applications for awards to individual students, and disburse funds
directly to scholarship recipients during the fiscal year. Eligibility
criteria shall include being a first-time freshman or a transfer student
and enrollment in an eligible program of study.
(c) For purposes of this section, an eligible program of study
includes the following:
(i) A program of study at a state college in rangeland management,
industrial technology, criminal justice, business administration,
education, communication, the Reserve Officers' Training Corps, or
computer information systems; and
(ii) Beginning with academic year 2024-25, a program of study
designated by the Department of Economic Development, in collaboration
with the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, based on
periodic reviews of workforce needs in the state.
(2) Each scholarship recipient shall register with the appropriate
campus office to obtain a Nebraska-based internship, apprenticeship,
clinical position, or employment in a major-related field prior to
-2-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
completion of the student's eligible program of study.
(3) A Nebraska Career Scholarship may be used by a scholarship
recipient for tuition, fees, required tools and equipment, and room and
board.
(4) Each scholarship awarded under this section shall be
automatically renewed on an annual basis if the student remains enrolled
in good standing in the eligible program of study for which such
scholarship was awarded, except that no student shall receive a
scholarship renewal after four years of participation in such eligible
program of study.
(5) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall
collect information on each state college scholarship recipient and shall
report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature and the Governor on
or before December 1 of each year the following information for the
eligible programs of study at a state college in the current or prior
academic year:
(a) The total number of students enrolled in each eligible program
of study in the immediately prior academic year and the total number of
students enrolled in each eligible program of study for the current
academic year, based upon official fall census data;
(b) The total number of scholarship recipients in each eligible
program of study for the current academic year and the total number of
such scholarship recipients who are newly enrolled in each eligible
program of study for such academic year, based upon official fall census
data;
(c) The total number of newly awarded scholarship recipients
retained across all eligible programs of study from the immediately prior
academic year to the current academic year and a comparison of the
retention rates between those of the newly awarded scholarship recipients
and the state college's overall first to second year retention rate
reported to the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System for the
-3-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
same year;
(d) The total number of scholarship recipients who graduated during
the immediately prior academic year and a comparison of the four-year
graduation rates between the scholarship recipients who graduated and the
state college's overall four-year graduate rate reported to the
Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System for the same year; and
(e) The number and percent of scholarship recipients who graduated
during the immediately prior calendar year who obtained employment in a
major-related field in the state.
(6) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall not
allocate any funds under the Nebraska Career Scholarship Act to any state
college campus that does not fully comply with the requirements of any
memorandum of understanding under section 85-309 or subsequent agreement
entered into by the Board of Trustees to submit data to the Nebraska
Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System.
Sec. 2. Section 85-3004, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
85-3004 (1)(a) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska
shall award a Nebraska Career Scholarship to any eligible university
student who is enrolled in an eligible program of study in an amount not
to exceed:
(i) Ten thousand dollars per year for any scholarship recipient who
is a transfer student; or
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section:
(A) Twenty-five thousand dollars per year for any scholarship
recipient who achieved a composite score on a standard college admission
test equivalent to a score of at least twenty-eight out of a maximum
score of thirty-six or an equivalent score on the SAT®; or
(B) Ten thousand dollars per year for any scholarship recipient who
achieved a composite score on a standard college admission test
equivalent to a score of at least twenty and less than twenty-eight out
-4-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
of a maximum score of thirty-six or an equivalent score on the SAT®.
(b) The Board of Regents shall allocate funds appropriated to the
board under the Nebraska Career Scholarship Act between the university
campuses, determine the eligibility of students enrolled in the
university, receive and process applications for awards to individual
students, and disburse funds directly to scholarship recipients during
the fiscal year. Eligibility criteria shall include (i) being a first-
time freshman who achieved a composite score on a standard college
admission test equivalent to a score of at least twenty out of a maximum
score of thirty-six or an equivalent score on the SAT® or a transfer
student and (ii) enrollment in an eligible program of study.
(c) For purposes of this section, an eligible program of study
means:
(i) Through academic year 2023-24, a program of study offered by the
University of Nebraska in mathematics, engineering, health care, and
computer information systems;
(ii) Beginning with academic year 2024-25, a program of study
designated by the Department of Economic Development, in collaboration
with the Board of Regents, based on periodic reviews of workforce needs
in the state; and
(iii) Beginning with academic year 2024-25, a program of study in
special education.
(2) Each scholarship recipient shall register with the appropriate
campus office to obtain a Nebraska-based internship, apprenticeship,
clinical position, or employment in a major-related field prior to
completion of the student's eligible program of study.
(3) A Nebraska Career Scholarship may be used by a scholarship
recipient for tuition, fees, required tools and equipment, and room and
board.
(4) Each scholarship awarded under this section shall be
automatically renewed on an annual basis if the student remains enrolled
-5-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
in good standing in the eligible program of study for which such
scholarship was awarded, except that no student shall receive a
scholarship renewal after four years of participation in such eligible
program of study.
(5) The Board of Regents shall collect information on each
university scholarship recipient and shall report electronically to the
Clerk of the Legislature and the Governor on or before December 1 of each
year the following information for the eligible programs of study at the
university in the current or prior academic year:
(a) The total number of students enrolled in each eligible program
of study in the immediately prior academic year and the total number of
students enrolled in each eligible program of study for the current
academic year, based upon official fall census data;
(b) The total number of scholarship recipients in each eligible
program of study for the current academic year and the total number of
such scholarship recipients who are newly enrolled in each eligible
program of study for such academic year, based upon official fall census
data;
(c) The total number of newly awarded scholarship recipients
retained across all eligible programs of study from the immediately prior
academic year to the current academic year and a comparison of the
retention rates between those of the newly awarded scholarship recipients
and the university's overall first to second year retention rate reported
to the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System for the same year;
(d) The total number of scholarship recipients who graduated during
the immediately prior academic year and a comparison of the four-year
graduation rates between the scholarship recipients who graduated and the
university's overall four-year graduate rate reported to the Integrated
Postsecondary Education Data System for the same year; and
(e) The number and percent of scholarship recipients who graduated
during the immediately prior calendar year who obtained employment in a
-6-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
major-related field in the state.
(6) The Board of Regents shall not allocate any funds under the
Nebraska Career Scholarship Act to any university campus that does not
fully comply with the requirements of any memorandum of understanding
under section 85-110 or subsequent agreement entered into by the Board of
Regents to submit data to the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education
Reporting System.
Sec. 3. Section 85-3005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-3005 (1)(a) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education, in collaboration with the community colleges, shall award a
Nebraska Career Scholarship that does not exceed a maximum of fifteen
thousand dollars per year to any eligible community college student who
is enrolled in an eligible program of study in an identified shortage
area or skilled trade that meets the workforce needs of the state.
(b) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, in
consultation with the State Department of Education, the Department of
Labor, the Department of Economic Development, and any advisory committee
established by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
for such purpose, shall identify shortage areas and skilled trades that
meet workforce needs for purposes of this section and shall periodically
review and revise the identification of such shortage areas and skilled
trades.
(c) For purposes of this section, an eligible program of study means
a program of study offered by a community college in a shortage area or
skilled trade identified pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(d) Each community college area, acting as an agent of the state,
shall determine the eligibility of students enrolled in the community
college, receive and process applications for awards to individual
students, and disburse funds directly to scholarship recipients during
the fiscal year. Eligibility criteria shall include being a first-time
-7-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
freshman or a transfer student and enrollment in an eligible program of
study.
(2) Each scholarship recipient enrolled in more than a one-semester
or sixteen-credit-hour program of study shall register with the
appropriate campus office to obtain a Nebraska-based internship,
apprenticeship, clinical position, experiential learning activity, or
employment in a major-related field prior to completion of the student's
eligible program of study.
(3) A Nebraska Career Scholarship may be used by the scholarship
recipient for tuition, fees, required tools and equipment, and room and
board.
(4) Each scholarship awarded under this section shall be
automatically renewed on an annual basis if the student remains enrolled
in good standing in the eligible program of study for which such
scholarship was awarded, except that no student shall receive a
scholarship renewal after three years of participation in such eligible
program of study.
(5) Each community college area shall collect information on each
scholarship recipient who has been awarded a Nebraska Career Scholarship
by such community college area and shall share such information with the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education.
(6) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall
report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature and the Governor on
or before December 1 of each year the following information:
(a) For each eligible program of study at a community college in the
current or prior academic year:
(i) The total number of students enrolled in the program in the
immediately prior academic year and the total number of students enrolled
in the program as of the most recent census date for the community
college area; and
(ii) The total number of scholarship recipients in the program as of
-8-

LB1247 LB1247
2026 2026
the most recent census date for the community college area;
(b) The first to second year retention rate of new scholarship
recipients for all eligible programs of study from the immediately prior
academic year as compared to the community college's overall first to
second year retention rate as reported to the Integrated Postsecondary
Education Data System for the same year;
(c) The total number of first-time freshman scholarship recipients
who complete the program of study by earning the certificate, diploma, or
degree that signifies completion and a comparison of the on-time
completion rate for scholarship recipients to the overall on-time
completion rate for all first-time freshman students; and
(d) The number of scholarship recipients obtaining employment in the
state within five fiscal quarters of completion of an eligible program of
study using Department of Labor data.
(7) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall
allocate to community colleges the amount appropriated to the commission
to carry out this section. The commission shall establish a separate
budget subprogram for such allocation.
(8) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall
not allocate any funds under the Nebraska Career Scholarship Act to any
community college area that does not fully comply with the requirements
of any memorandum of understanding under section 85-1511 or subsequent
agreement entered into by the board of governors of such community
college area to submit data to the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and
Education Reporting System.
Sec. 4. Original section 85-3005, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 85-3003 and 85-3004, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-9-